src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v4_julkas  !!≈ * **@CODE@** julkasta etc
+V+Inf:%>^N^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^N^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:ten K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:te%>ss^A K ; !CHECK! ACT
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:tae%>ss^A K ; !CHECK! PASS
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>heen K ; !kortform, purasheen
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^Al^A K ; 
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%>h^A^An K ; !CHECK EK denna form också??
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>^N^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>s^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>s^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hee x3_obli ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:hee x3_oblique ; !
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !julkassu
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^U%>t K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:e%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:e%>vv^A x3 ; !variantform vv
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>t^Avv^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>t^Avv^At K ;

+V+Pass+Cond:%>i4s K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:e # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:e%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:e%>mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>vv^A K ; !variantform purasevva
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:e%>e K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:e%>v^At K ; ! K&P p. 95.  without -t

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>iv^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>thiin K ; !CHECK! GEO

!+V+Act+Cond:%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>i4sim^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4siv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i4sivv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i4siv^At K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4sit K ;

+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:t%>^Ut K ; !TEST
+V+AgPrc:e%>m^A K ;
+V+Der/minen:emi nen ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:^WGe # ; !plus älä (älä anna)
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>k^O # ; !plus älä (älkää antako)

LEXICON v4_la_even
v4_la ; !general contlex
+V+InfMa+Ade:le%>m^Al^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:l%>t^Av^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:l%>t^Av^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
!+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:l%>t^Avv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla !Ej variation i participformer
!+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:l%>t^Avv^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla !Ej variation i participformer
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>v^A K ;  !TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>vv^A K ;  !TODO -la / -lla

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>i3mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3v^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:l%>i4s%>im^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>iv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+AgPrc:le%>mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:le%>v^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:le%>v^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:le%>vv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla !Ej variation i participformer
!+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:le%>vv^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla !Ej variation i participformer

LEXICON v4_la_odd
v4_la ; !general contlex
+V+InfMa+Ade:le%>m^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:l%>t^Av^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:l%>t^Av^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>m^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>v^A K ;  !TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>i3m^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3v^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3vv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:l%>i4s%>imm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>iv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>ivv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+AgPrc:le%>m^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:le%>v^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:le%>v^At K ; ! TODO -la / -lla

LEXICON v4_la  !!≈ * **@CODE@** varjela:varjel
+V+Inf:^WG%>l^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>l^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:len K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:l%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:l%>t^Aess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:le%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:le%>mh^A^An K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ine:le%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:le%>m^Ast^A K ;
!+V+InfMa+Ade:le%>m^Al^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+InfMa+Abe:le%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:l%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:hl%>^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:l%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:l%>^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:l%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:l%>^U K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:l%>^Ut K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>lhee x3_oblique ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>hlee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:l%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc:^WG%>lt^U x3_oblique ;

+V+Pass+Cond:l%>t^Ai4s K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:le K ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:le # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:l%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:l%>kh^O^On # ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:le%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:le%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:le%>e K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:le%>tt^A K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>v^A K ;  !TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:le%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:l%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:hl%>^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:le%>v^At K ; 

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:l%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:l%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:l%>i3 K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>i3mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:l%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:l%>i3t K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:l%>i3v^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:l%>thiin K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:l%>i4sin K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:l%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:l%>i4s K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:l%>i4simm^A K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:l%>i4s%>im^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:l%>i4s%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>it K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:l%>i4s%>iv^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla

!+V+AgPrc:le%>mm^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+V+Der/minen:lemi nen ;

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:le # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:l%>k^O # ;
