src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
laela:lae v4_la_even ;
kohela:kohe v4_la_even ;
nuhela:nuhe v4_la_even ;
roijela:roije v4_la_even ;
voijela:voije v4_la_even ;
varjela:varje v4_la_even ;
nakela:nakke v4_la_even ;
mairiskela:mairiske v4_la_odd ;
nukela:nukke v4_la_even ;
kaalela:kaale v4_la_even ;
palela:pale v4_la_even ;
valela:vale v4_la_even ;
laulela:laule v4_la_even ;
painela:paine v4_la_even ;
annela:anne v4_la_even ;
kannela:kanne v4_la_even ;
kuunela:kuunt4e v4_la_even ;
tapela:tappe v4_la_even ;
aatela:aatte v4_la_even ;
latela:lat2e v4_la_even ;
vaihtela:vaiht2e v4_la_even ;
laitela:laitte v4_la_even ;
poltela:poltte v4_la_even ;
otela:otte v4_la_even ;
ootela:ootte v4_la_even ;
totela:totte v4_la_even ;
puotela:puotte v4_la_even ;
kastela:kaste v4_la_even ;
haistela:haiste v4_la_even ;
maistela:maiste v4_la_even ;
paistela:paiste v4_la_even ;
taistela:taiste v4_la_even ;
luistela:luiste v4_la_even ;
muistela:muiste v4_la_even ;
kostela:koste v4_la_even ;
nostela:noste v4_la_even ;
kattela:katt2e v4_la_even ;
jutela:jutte v4_la_even ;
utela:ute v4_la_even ;
palvela:palve v4_la_even ;
arvela:arve v4_la_even ;
ihhaila:ihhai v4_la_even ;
ihaila:ihai v4_la_even ;
majaila:majai v4_la_even ;
nuhjaila:nuhjai v4_la_even ;
leijaila:leijai v4_la_even ;
koijaila:koijai v4_la_even ;
marjaila:marjai v4_la_even ;
orjaila:orjai v4_la_even ;
lurjaila:lurjai v4_la_even ;
siekaila:siek2ai v4_la_even ;
uhkaila:uhkai v4_la_even ;
paikkaila:paikkai v4_la_even ;
ilkaila:ilkai v4_la_even ;
venkaila:venkai v4_la_even ;
tiskaila:tiskai v4_la_even ;
kerskaila:kerskai v4_la_even ;
tuskaila:tuskai v4_la_even ;
vetkaila:vetkai v4_la_even ;
jutkaila:jutkai v4_la_even ;
leukaila:leuk2ai v4_la_even ;
nuukaila:nuuk2ai v4_la_even ;
kaalaila:kaalai v4_la_even ;
pilaila:pilai v4_la_even ;
kellaila:kellai v4_la_even ;
kollaila:kollai v4_la_even ;
kullaila:kullai v4_la_even ;
ulkokullaila:ulkokullai v4_la_even ;
praamaila:praamai v4_la_even ;
liimaila:liimai v4_la_even ;
kummaila:kummai v4_la_even ;
tuumaila:tuumai v4_la_even ;
lainaila:lainai v4_la_even ;
meinaila:meinai v4_la_even ;
konnaila:konnai v4_la_even ;
kaunaila:kaunai v4_la_even ;
kaipaila:kaipai v4_la_even ;
kelpaila:kelpai v4_la_even ;
kilpaila:kilpai v4_la_even ;
kamppaila:kampp2ai v4_la_even ;
kauppaila:kaupp2ai v4_la_even ;
luppaila:luppai v4_la_even ;
urpaila:urpai v4_la_even ;
lupaila:lupai v4_la_even ;
vieraila:vierai v4_la_even ;
mairaila:mairai v4_la_even ;
nooraila:noorai v4_la_even ;
torraila:torrai v4_la_even ;
luuraila:luurai v4_la_even ;
kursaila:kursai v4_la_even ;
kitsaila:kitsai v4_la_even ;
kiusaila:kiusai v4_la_even ;
kehtaila:kehtai v4_la_even ;
lastaila:lastai v4_la_even ;
vastaila:vastai v4_la_even ;
freistaila:freistai v4_la_even ;
kiistaila:kiistai v4_la_even ;
fästaila:fästai v4_la_even ;
faarttaila:faartt2ai v4_la_even ; ! xxx
karttaila:kartt2ai v4_la_even ;
kiivaila:kiivai v4_la_even ;
tauvaila:tauvai v4_la_even ;
valheila:valhei v4_la_even ;
lohkeila:lohkei v4_la_even ;
kokkeila:kokkei v4_la_even ;
lankeila:lankei v4_la_even ;
kaskeila:kaskei v4_la_even ;
laukeila:laukei v4_la_even ;
oleila:olei v4_la_even ;
kommeila:kommei v4_la_even ;
koppeila:koppei v4_la_even ;
haaveila:haavei v4_la_even ;
uhkaila:uhkai v4_la_even ;
korhoila:korhoi v4_la_even ;
uijoila:uijoi v4_la_even ;
ujoila:ujoi v4_la_even ;
makoila:makoi v4_la_even ;
kihkoila:kihkoi v4_la_even ;
lohkoila:lohkoi v4_la_even ;
loikoila:loikoi v4_la_even ;
makkoila:makkoi v4_la_even ;
hikkoila:hikkoi v4_la_even ;
likkoila:likkoi v4_la_even ;
poukkoila:poukkoi v4_la_even ;
rukkoila:rukkoi v4_la_even ;
suukkoila:suukkoi v4_la_even ;
venkoila:venkoi v4_la_even ;
lonkoila:lonkoi v4_la_even ;
liukoila:liukoi v4_la_even ;
rukoila:rukoi v4_la_even ;
palloila:palloi v4_la_even ;
jolloila:jolloi v4_la_even ;
kirroila:kirroi v4_la_even ;
persoila:persoi v4_la_even ;
intoila:intoi v4_la_even ;
muijuila:muijui v4_la_even ;
koukkuila:koukkui v4_la_even ;
loimuila:loimui v4_la_even ;
hapuila:hapui v4_la_even ;
piippuila:piippui v4_la_even ;
kirppuila:kirppui v4_la_even ;
pirruila:pirrui v4_la_even ;
tursuila:tursui v4_la_even ;
kaatuila:kaatui v4_la_even ;
kittuila:kitt2ui v4_la_even ;
tuittuila:tuitt2ui v4_la_even ;
kranttuila:krantt2ui v4_la_even ;
yytmoola:yytmoo v4_la_even ;
kuola:kuo v4_la_odd ;
nuola:nuo v4_la_odd ;
vuola:vuo v4_la_odd ;
kuula:kuu v4_la_odd ;
luula:luu v4_la_odd ;
tuula:tuu v4_la_odd ;
vetelä:vete v4_la_even  ;
liielä:liie v4_la_even ;
riielä:riie v4_la_even ;
nielä:nie v4_la_odd ;
pahonpielä:pahon#pie v4_la_odd ;
viljelä:vilje v4_la_even ;
kiellelä:kielle v4_la_even ;
lienelä:liene v4_la_even ;
lennelä:lenne v4_la_even ;
hypelä:hyppe v4_la_even ;
kierelä:kiere v4_la_even ;
piirelä:piire v4_la_even ;
kierrelä:kierre v4_la_even ;
kyselä:kyse v4_la_even ;
vietelä:viette v4_la_even ;
petelä:pette v4_la_even ;
röyhtelä:röyht2e v4_la_even ;
keitelä:keite v4_la_even ;
kiitelä:kiite v4_la_even ;
niitelä:niite v4_la_even ;
kiistelä:kiiste v4_la_even ;
pistelä:piste v4_la_even ;
tyytelä:tyytte v4_la_even ;
näytelä:näytte v4_la_even ;
kätelä:kätte v4_la_even ;
jyyvelä:jyyve v4_la_even ;
kävelä:käve v4_la_even ;
myöelä:myöe v4_la_even ;
pöyhkeilä:pöyhkei v4_la_even ;
ilkeilä:ilkei v4_la_even ;
ylpeilä:ylpei v4_la_even ;
kääreilä:käärei v4_la_even ;
ilveilä:ilvei v4_la_even ;
pilveilä:pilvei v4_la_even ;
häijyilä:häijyi v4_la_even ;
hymmyilä:hymmyi v4_la_even ;
hymyilä:hymyi v4_la_even ;
hyrryilä:hyrryi v4_la_even ;
värryilä:värryi v4_la_even ;
läijäilä:läijäi v4_la_even ;
hämmäilä:hämmäi v4_la_even ;
jäynäilä:jäynäi v4_la_even ;
eppäilä:eppäi v4_la_even ;
hyrräilä:hyrräi v4_la_even ;
tääräilä:tääräi v4_la_even ;
fästäilä:fästäi v4_la_even ;
hättäilä:hätt2äi v4_la_even ; ! xxx
huokaila:huokai v4_la_even ;
